Hawaii statutes.
§383-168 Definitions. As used in this
part, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1) "Extended benefit period" means a
period which:

(A) Begins with the third week after the first
week for which there is a state "on" indicator; and

(B) Ends with either of the following weeks,
whichever occurs later:

(i) The third week after the first week for
which there is a state "off" indicator; or

(ii) The thirteenth consecutive week of such
period; provided that no extended benefit period may begin before the
fourteenth week following the end of a prior extended benefit period which was
in effect with respect to this State.

(2) (A) There is a "state 'on'
indicator" for this State for a week which begins before September 26,
1982, if the director of labor and industrial relations determines, in
accordance with the regulations of the United States Secretary of Labor, that
for the period consisting of such week and the immediately preceding twelve
weeks, the rate of insured unemployment (not seasonally adjusted) under this
chapter:

(i) Equaled or exceeded 120 per cent of the
average of such rates for the corresponding thirteen-week period ending in each
of the preceding two calendar years, and

(ii) Equaled or exceeded 4 per cent.

(B) There is a "state 'on'
indicator" for this State for a week which begins after September 25,
1982, if the director of labor and industrial relations determines, in
accordance with the regulations of the United States Secretary of Labor, that
for the period consisting of such week and the immediately preceding twelve
weeks, the rate of insured unemployment (not seasonally adjusted) under this
chapter:

(i) Equaled or exceeded 120 per cent of the
average of such rates for the corresponding thirteen-week period ending in each
of the preceding two calendar years, and

(ii) Equaled or exceeded 5 per cent.

(3) (A) There is a "state 'off'
indicator" for this State for a week which begins before
September 26, 1982, if the director determines, in accordance with the regulations
of the United States Secretary of Labor, that for the period consisting of such
week and the immediately preceding twelve weeks, the rate of insured
unemployment (not seasonally adjusted) under this chapter:

(i) Was less than 120 per cent of the average
of such rates for the corresponding thirteen-week period ending in each of the
preceding two calendar years, or

(ii) Was less than 4 per cent.

(B) There is a "state 'off'
indicator" for this State for a week which begins after September 25,
1982, if the director determines, in accordance with the regulations of the
United States Secretary of Labor, that for the period consisting of such week
and the immediately preceding twelve weeks, the rate of insured unemployment
(not seasonally adjusted) under this chapter:

(i) Was less than 120 per cent of the average
of such rates for the corresponding thirteen-week period ending in each of the
preceding two calendar years, or

(ii) Was less than 5 per cent.

(4) (A) Effective with respect to compensation
for weeks of unemployment beginning after December 31, 1977, the determination
of whether there has been a state "on" or "off" indicator
shall be made under paragraphs (2)(A) and (3)(A) of this section as if
paragraph (2)(A) did not contain clause (i) thereof and the figure
"4" contained in clause (ii) thereof were "5", and as if
paragraph (3)(A) did not contain clause (i) thereof and the figure
"4" contained in clause (ii) thereof were "5"; except that,
notwithstanding the other provisions of this paragraph to the contrary, any
week for which there would otherwise be a state "on" indicator shall
continue to be such a week and shall not be determined to be a week for which
there is a state "off" indicator.

(B) Effective with respect to compensation for
weeks of unemployment beginning after September 25, 1982, the
determination of whether there has been a state "on" or
"off" indicator shall be made under paragraphs (2)(B) and (3)(B) of
this section as if paragraph (2)(B) did not contain clause (i) thereof and the
figure "5" contained in clause (ii) thereof were "6";
except that, notwithstanding the other provisions of this paragraph to the
contrary, any week for which there would otherwise be a state "on"
indicator shall continue to be such a week and shall not be determined to be a
week for which there is a state "off" indicator.

(5) "Rate of insured unemployment," for
purposes of paragraphs (2) and (3) of this section, means the percentage
derived by dividing:

(A) The average weekly number of individuals
filing claims for regular compensation in this State for weeks of unemployment
with respect to the most recent thirteen-consecutive-week period, as determined
by the director on the basis of the director's reports to the United States
Secretary of Labor, by

(B) The average monthly employment covered
under this chapter for the first four of the most recent six completed calendar
quarters ending before the end of such thirteen-week period.

(6) "Regular benefits" means benefits
payable to an individual under this chapter or under any other state law
(including benefits payable to federal civilian employees and ex-servicemen
pursuant to 5 United States Code chapter 85) other than extended benefits and
additional benefits.

(7) "Extended benefits" means benefits
(including benefits payable to federal civilian employees and to ex-servicemen
pursuant to 5 United States Code chapter 85) payable to an individual under the
provisions of this part for weeks of unemployment in the individual's
eligibility period.

(8) "Additional benefits" means benefits
payable to exhaustees by reason of conditions of high unemployment or by reason
of other special factors under the provisions of any state law, including but
not limited to chapter 385.

(9) "Eligibility period" of an individual
means the period consisting of the weeks in the individual's benefit year which
begin in an extended benefit period and, if the individual's benefit year ends
within such extended benefit period, any week thereafter which begins in such period.

(10) "Exhaustee" means an individual who,
with respect to any week of unemployment in the individual's eligibility
period:

(A) Has received, prior to such week, all of
the regular benefits that were available to the individual under this chapter
or any other state law (including dependents' allowances and benefits payable
to federal civilian employees and ex-servicemen under 5 United States Code
chapter 85) in the individual's current benefit year that includes such week;
provided that for the purposes of this subparagraph, an individual shall be
deemed to have received all of the regular benefits that were available to the
individual although, as a result of a pending appeal with respect to wages
and/or employment that were not considered in the original monetary
determination in the individual's benefit year, the individual may subsequently
be determined to be entitled to added regular benefits; or

(B) The individual's benefit year having
expired prior to such week has no, or has insufficient, wages and/or employment
on the basis of which the individual could establish a new benefit year that
would include such week; and

(C) (i) Has no right to unemployment benefits or
allowances, as the case may be, under the Railroad Unemployment Insurance Act,
the Trade Expansion Act of 1962, the Automotive Products Trade Act of 1965, and
such other federal laws as are specified in regulations issued by the United
States Secretary of Labor; and

(ii) Has not received and is not seeking
unemployment benefits under the unemployment compensation law of the Virgin
Islands or of Canada; but if the individual is seeking such benefits and the
appropriate agency finally determines that the individual is not entitled to
benefits under such law the individual is considered an exhaustee; provided
that this provision shall not be applicable to benefits under the Virgin
Islands law beginning on the day after the day on which the United States
Secretary of Labor approves under section 3304(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of
1954 an unemployment compensation law submitted by the Virgin Islands for
approval.

(11) "State law" means the unemployment
insurance law of any state, approved by the United States Secretary of Labor
under section 3304 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954. [L 1971, c 187, pt of
§13; am L 1973, c 120, §4; am L 1974, c 156, §2; am L 1977, c 148, §9; am L
1982, c 58, §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next